District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-408

Qualifications of shareholders, director, and officer; “officer” defined.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 578, Pub. L. 92-180, § 8
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-408.
1981 Ed., § 29-608.
1973 Ed., § 29-1108.